Tennessee, session 114, HB2273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-137(d), is amended by
adding the following to the end of the subsection:
The state fire marshal shall also make available on the state fire marshal's website
training materials to assist in the training of owners, tenants, or their employees in
methods of fire drills.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2273
012746
- 1 -